Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2351.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 37-233, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE37-233. Sale of state lands; restriction on sale of timber land; expense of sale; rules A. On receiving an application, or on the commissioner's initiative, the state land department, under the rules of the department, may cause state lands to be sold if the sale of them is not prohibited by law. B. Land containing timber of a value which in the opinion of the commissioner should be sold separately from the land shall not be subject to sale until after the timber is sold. C. When an application is filed with the department for selection or sale of land under the laws of this state, and the department determines that the benefit to be derived from the selection or sale is less than the expense involved, the commissioner may accept from the applicant an amount of money sufficient to pay the expense incidental to the selection or sale. If the applicant fails to secure a lease after selection of land, or fails to purchase land after bidding for it, the successful lessee or purchaser shall reimburse the original applicant for all funds so advanced. D. Rules adopted pursuant to subsection a of this section shall establish a procedure and criteria that the commissioner must use for determining whether to initiate the sale of state lands by the commissioner's own initiative. END_STATUTE